en: Fruit pies with confectioner's custard
fr: Tartes aux fruits et crème pâtissière

en: Fruit tarts, Fruit pies
de: Torten mit obst
fr: Tartes aux fruits
hr: Voćne torte

en: Lemon tarts, Lemon pies, Lemon tart
de: Zitronentorten
es: Tartas de limón, Pasteles de limón
fi: sitruunaleivokset
fr: Tartes au citron, Tarte au citron
hr: Kolačići od limuna
ja: レモンタルト, レモンパイ
nl: Citroentaarten

en: Lemon meringue pies
de: Zitronen Baiser Torten
fi: sitruunamarenkipiirakat
fr: Tartes au citron meringuées, tarte au citron meringuée
hr: Beze pite od limuna
it: Torta meringata al limone
nl: Citroen meringue taart

en: Red berries tart
fr: Tarte aux fruits rouges
hr: Tart od crvenih bobica
nl: Taart met rode vruchten

fr: Tarte aux groseilles
en: Red currant tart
de: Johannisbeerkuchen
es: Tarta de grosellas rojas
hr: Tart od crvenog ribiza
nl: Rode bessentaart

fr: Tartes au riz
nl: Rijsttaarten

en: Maple syrup Tarts, Maple syrup pies
fr: Tartes au sirop d'érable, tarte au sirop d'érable

en: Sugar pies
fr: Tartes au sucre, Tarte au sucre
hr: Šećerne pite
nl: Taarten met suiker

en: Apricot pies, Apricots tart
de: Aprikosenkuchen, Marillenkuchen
fr: Tartes aux abricots, Tartes à l'abricot, Tarte aux abricots, Tarte à l'abricot
hr: Pite od marelica
nl: Abrikozentaart

en: Raspberry pies, Raspberry tarts
de: Himbeerkuchen
es: Tartas de frambuesa
fi: Vadelmapiirakat, Vadelmatortut
fr: Tartes aux framboises
hr: Pite od malina
it: Crostate di lamponi
nl: Frambozentaarten
pt: Tartes de framboesa

en: Blueberry pies, blueberry pie
fi: Mustikkapiirakat, mustikkapiirakka
fr: Tartes aux myrtilles, Tartes à la myrtille, Tarte aux myrtilles, Tarte à la myrtille
hr: Pite od borovnica
nl: Bosbessentaarten, Bosbessentaart, Bosbestaart

en: Strawberry pies, Strawberry tart, Strawberries tart
de: Erdbeerkuchen
fr: Tartes aux fraises, tartes à la fraise, tarte aux fraises, tarte à la fraise
hr: Pite od jagoda
ja: いちごパイ, いちごタルト
nl: Aardbeientaart, Taarten met aardbeien

en: Apple pies, Apple tarts
de: Apfelkuchen
es: Pasteles de manzana
fi: omenapiiraat
fr: Tartes aux pommes, Tarte aux pommes, Tartes à la pomme, Tarte à la pomme, Tartelettes aux pommes, Tartelette aux pommes
hr: Pite od jabuka
it: Torte di mele
ja: アップルパイ
nl: Appeltaarten

en: Dutch apple pies
fr: Tartes aux pommes néerlandaises, Tarte aux pommes néerlandaise, Tartes à la pomme néerlandaises, Tarte à la pomme néerlandaise
hr: Nizozemske pite od jabuka
nl: Nederlandse appeltaarten

en: Tatin tart, Caramelized upside-down apple tart
fr: Tartes Tatin, Tarte Tatin, Tarte Tatin aux pommes
hr: Tatin kolač
nl: Tarte Tatin
ru: Тарт Татен

en: Frozen apple pies
de: Tiefgekühlte Apfelkuchen, Tiefgekühlter Apfelkuchen, Tiefgekühlte Apfelküchlein, Tiefgekühltes Apfelküchlein
es: Tartas de manzana congeladas, Tarta de manzana congelada, Tartaletas de manzana congeladas, Tartaleta de manzana congelada
fr: Tartes aux pommes surgelées, Tarte aux pommes surgelée, Tartelettes aux pommes surgelées, Tartelette aux pommes surgelée
hr: Smrznute pite od jabuka
nl: Bevroren appeltaarten, Bevroren appeltaart, Bevroren appeltaartjes, Bevroren appeltaartje

en: Pear pies
de: Birnenkuchen
fr: Tartes aux poires, Tarte aux poires, Tartes à la poire, Tarte à la poire
hr: Pite od krušaka
nl: Peertaarten

en: Pear tart with almonds
de: Birnentorte mit Mandeln
es: Tarta de pera con almendras
fr: Tarte aux poires amandine
hr: Tart od krušaka s bademima
it: Crostata di pere e mandorle
nl: Perentaart met amandelen

en: Norman-style pies, Pies from Normandy, Apple pie with custard and flour and eggs and cream and sugar and apple and alcohol
fi: normandialaisia piiraita
fr: Tartes normandes, Tarte normande, Tarte normande aux pommes avec garniture farine œufs crème sucre calvados
hr: Pite na normanski način
nl: Normandische taarten